Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB61.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 211.203 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Class A" means any pool or bathing facility intended for or used by the
general public for recreational use; and
(b) "Class B" means any pool not open to the general public, but open to limited
groups and their invited guests, including but not limited to:
1. Health or athletic clubs;
2. Country clubs; or
3. Residential communities.
(2) (a) Lifeguards shall be required at all Class A and Class B pools if the pool
facility meets at least one (1) of the following criteria:
1. Allows persons seventeen (17) years of age or younger to enter the pool
facility enclosure without a responsible adult eighteen (18) years or
older;
2. Contains features such as induced waves or slides that are available for
use; or
3. Contains an entry into the pool from a height above the deck from a
diving board, platform, climbing wall or other similar feature, that is
available for use.
(b) If a Class A or Class B pool meets any of the criteria in paragraph (a) of this
subsection, it shall provide one (1) lifeguard for each one (1) to one hundred
(100) bathers.
(3) Lifeguards shall be required at all Class A pools that do not meet any of the criteria
in subsection (2)(a) of this section if the pool facility has:
(a) Two thousand (2,000) square feet or greater of water surface area, in which
Page 1 of 2
BR111100.100 - 1111 - XXXX 2/12/2025 3:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1111
case it shall provide one (1) lifeguard for each two thousand (2,000) square
feet or major fraction more than half thereof; or
(b) One hundred (100) or more bathers, in which case it shall provide one (1)
lifeguard for each one hundred (100) or more bathers.
(4) At a pool where the use is intended for aquatic events, swimming practice, or
swimming competition, the swimming coach or instructor that provides instruction
during the program may count as a lifeguard, provided the coach or instructor can
supervise the entire group.
(5) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services may allow Class A and Class B pools to submit an alternative
lifeguard staffing plan that has been certified by a third-party compliance specialist
that is recognized by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.
(6) All Class A and Class B pools shall be equipped with an emergency shut-off switch
to disconnect power to pool recirculation, chemical feed, and electrical devices
engaged with the water circulation system, which is located at a place quickly
accessible to lifeguards and other pool staff, but secure from the public.
(7) Any pool located on the same plat as a single-family residence intended only for
the use of the owner and his or her guests, regardless of whether the guests
gained use of the private single-family residence pool through a sharing platform
or pay a fee for its use,[and not used in connection with a home occupation or
business] shall be exempted from the provisions of this section.
(8) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.
Page 2 of 2
BR111100.100 - 1111 - XXXX 2/12/2025 3:09 PM Jacketed